Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5192.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-19 of the General Laws entitled "Operation of Bicycles" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-19-6.1. Bicycle trail or path regulation.
(a) Bicycle path users shall observe all traffic rules and signs.
(b) All users, including bicyclists, pedestrians, joggers, inline skaters, roller skaters,
skateboarders, scooter riders and any authorized electric motorized vehicle users, shall stay to the
right while using the bike path.
(c) Passing on the bike path is always on the left when safe to do so.
(d) Hand signals and verbal notification is required when passing others.
(e) The Rhode Island department of transportation has jurisdiction over the bike paths in
Rhode Island and shall promulgate and enforce rules and regulations necessary for the
implementation of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000056
========